Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska47-633
Fees.

In addition to all other court costs assessed according to law, a uniform data analysis fee of one dollar shall be taxed as costs for each case filed in each county court, separate juvenile court, and district court, including appeals to such courts, and for each appeal and original action filed in the Court of Appeals and the Supreme Court. The fees shall be remitted to the State Treasurer on forms prescribed by the State Treasurer within ten days after the end of each month. The State Treasurer shall credit the fees to the Community Corrections Uniform Data Analysis Cash Fund.

Laws 2003, LB 46, § 45;

Laws 2007, LB322, § 7.